sk_SK-spell/sk_SK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2709 N 1
SFX 2709 n eho .
SFX 2710 Y 1
SFX 2710 n 0 .
PFX 2710 Y 1
PFX 2710 0 h .
SFX 2711 Y 1
SFX 2711 0 emu .
PFX 2711 Y 1
PFX 2711 o 0 .
SFX 2712 Y 1
SFX 2712 n m .
PFX 2712 Y 1
PFX 2712 0 ň .
SFX 2713 Y 1
SFX 2713 0 ím .
PFX 2713 Y 1
PFX 2713 o 0 .
SFX 2714 Y 1
SFX 2714 0 ich .
PFX 2714 Y 1
PFX 2714 o 0 .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 im .
PFX 2715 Y 1
PFX 2715 o 0 .
SFX 2716 Y 1
SFX 2716 0 imi .
PFX 2716 Y 1
PFX 2716 o 0 .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 e .
PFX 2717 Y 1
PFX 2717 o 0 .
SFX 2718 Y 1
SFX 2718 a ej .
PFX 2718 Y 1
PFX 2718 o 0 .
SFX 2719 Y 1
SFX 2719 na u .
PFX 2719 Y 1
PFX 2719 0 ň .
SFX 2720 Y 1
SFX 2720 a ich .
PFX 2720 Y 1
PFX 2720 o 0 .
SFX 2721 Y 1
SFX 2721 a im .
PFX 2721 Y 1
PFX 2721 o 0 .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 a e .
PFX 2722 Y 1
PFX 2722 o 0 .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 a imi .
PFX 2723 Y 1
PFX 2723 o 0 .
SFX 2724 N 1
SFX 2724 en ého .
SFX 2725 N 1
SFX 2725 en ému .
SFX 2726 N 1
SFX 2726 en é .
SFX 2727 N 1
SFX 2727 en á .
SFX 2728 N 1
SFX 2728 n j .
SFX 2729 N 1
SFX 2729 en ú .
SFX 2730 N 1
SFX 2730 en ou .
SFX 2731 N 1
SFX 2731 en o .
SFX 2732 Y 1
SFX 2732 no 0 .
PFX 2732 Y 1
PFX 2732 0 jeh .
SFX 2733 N 1
SFX 2733 no eho .
SFX 2734 Y 1
SFX 2734 no 0 .
PFX 2734 Y 1
PFX 2734 0 h .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 o emu .
PFX 2735 Y 1
PFX 2735 o 0 .
SFX 2736 Y 1
SFX 2736 no m .
PFX 2736 Y 1
PFX 2736 0 ň .
SFX 2737 Y 1
SFX 2737 o ím .
PFX 2737 Y 1
PFX 2737 o 0 .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 o ich .
PFX 2738 Y 1
PFX 2738 o 0 .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 o im .
PFX 2739 Y 1
PFX 2739 o 0 .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 o e .
PFX 2740 Y 1
PFX 2740 o 0 .
SFX 2741 Y 1
SFX 2741 o imi .
PFX 2741 Y 1
PFX 2741 o 0 .
SFX 2742 N 1
SFX 2742 uca úc .
SFX 2743 N 1
SFX 2743 ô é .
SFX 2744 N 1
SFX 2744 ô ých .
SFX 2745 N 1
SFX 2745 ô ým .
SFX 2746 N 1
SFX 2746 ô ými .
SFX 2747 N 1
SFX 2747 ô oho .
SFX 2748 N 1
SFX 2748 ô omu .
SFX 2749 N 1
SFX 2749 ô om .
SFX 2750 N 1
SFX 2750 ý ô .
SFX 2751 N 1
SFX 2751 acha ách .
SFX 2752 Y 1
SFX 2752 a 0 .
PFX 2752 Y 1
PFX 2752 o ô .
SFX 2753 Y 1
SFX 2753 em mich .
PFX 2753 Y 1
PFX 2753 o ô .
SFX 2754 Y 1
SFX 2754 em mim .
PFX 2754 Y 1
PFX 2754 o ô .
SFX 2755 Y 1
SFX 2755 em mimi .
PFX 2755 Y 1
PFX 2755 o ô .
SFX 2756 Y 1
SFX 2756 em mi .
PFX 2756 Y 1
PFX 2756 o ô .
SFX 2757 N 1
SFX 2757 ľa lenciam .
SFX 2758 N 1
SFX 2758 uby úb .
SFX 2759 N 1
SFX 2759 ca iec .
SFX 2760 N 1
SFX 2760 os sa .
SFX 2761 N 1
SFX 2761 os su .
SFX 2762 N 1
SFX 2762 os se .
SFX 2763 N 1
SFX 2763 os som .
SFX 2764 N 1
SFX 2764 os sy .
SFX 2765 N 1
SFX 2765 os sov .
SFX 2766 N 1
SFX 2766 os soch .
SFX 2767 N 1
SFX 2767 os sami .
SFX 2768 N 1
SFX 2768 ista íst .
SFX 2769 N 1
SFX 2769 ok ci .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 a 0 .
PFX 2770 Y 1
PFX 2770 pa pá .
SFX 2771 N 1
SFX 2771 ti ťami .
SFX 2772 N 1
SFX 2772 í eho .
SFX 2773 N 1
SFX 2773 í emu .
SFX 2774 N 1
SFX 2774 í e .
SFX 2775 N 1
SFX 2775 í a .
SFX 2776 N 1
SFX 2776 í u .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 a 0 .
PFX 2777 Y 1
PFX 2777 p pi .
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 kne rajšie .
PFX 2778 Y 1
PFX 2778 p 0 .
SFX 2779 Y 1
SFX 2779 kne ajkrajšie .
PFX 2779 Y 1
PFX 2779 p 0 .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 ný rajší .
PFX 2780 Y 1
PFX 2780 pe 0 .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 kný rajšieho .
PFX 2781 Y 1
PFX 2781 p 0 .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 kný rajšiemu .
PFX 2782 Y 1
PFX 2782 p 0 .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 ný rajšom .
PFX 2783 Y 1
PFX 2783 pe 0 .
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 ný rajším .
PFX 2784 Y 1
PFX 2784 pe 0 .
SFX 2785 Y 1
SFX 2785 ný rajších .
PFX 2785 Y 1
PFX 2785 pe 0 .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 ný rajšími .
PFX 2786 Y 1
PFX 2786 pe 0 .
SFX 2787 Y 1
SFX 2787 kný rajšie .
PFX 2787 Y 1
PFX 2787 p 0 .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 ný rajšia .
PFX 2788 Y 1
PFX 2788 pe 0 .
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 kný rajšej .
PFX 2789 Y 1
PFX 2789 p 0 .
SFX 2790 Y 1
SFX 2790 ný rajšiu .
PFX 2790 Y 1
PFX 2790 pe 0 .
SFX 2791 Y 1
SFX 2791 ný rajšou .
PFX 2791 Y 1
PFX 2791 pe 0 .
SFX 2792 Y 1
SFX 2792 ný ajkrajší .
PFX 2792 Y 1
PFX 2792 pe 0 .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 kný ajkrajšieho .
PFX 2793 Y 1
PFX 2793 p 0 .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 kný ajkrajšiemu .
PFX 2794 Y 1
PFX 2794 p 0 .
SFX 2795 Y 1
SFX 2795 ný ajkrajšom .
PFX 2795 Y 1
PFX 2795 pe 0 .
SFX 2796 Y 1
SFX 2796 ný ajkrajším .
PFX 2796 Y 1
PFX 2796 pe 0 .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 ný ajkrajších .
PFX 2797 Y 1
PFX 2797 pe 0 .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 ný ajkrajšími .
PFX 2798 Y 1
PFX 2798 pe 0 .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 kný ajkrajšie .
PFX 2799 Y 1
PFX 2799 p 0 .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 ný ajkrajšia .
PFX 2800 Y 1
PFX 2800 pe 0 .
SFX 2801 Y 1
SFX 2801 kný ajkrajšej .
PFX 2801 Y 1
PFX 2801 p 0 .
SFX 2802 Y 1
SFX 2802 ný ajkrajšiu .
PFX 2802 Y 1
PFX 2802 pe 0 .
SFX 2803 Y 1
SFX 2803 ný ajkrajšou .
PFX 2803 Y 1
PFX 2803 pe 0 .
SFX 2804 N 1
SFX 2804 alta ált .
SFX 2805 Y 1
SFX 2805 o 0 .
PFX 2805 Y 1
PFX 2805 p pi .
SFX 2806 N 1
SFX 2806 es sa .
SFX 2807 N 1
SFX 2807 es sovi .
SFX 2808 N 1
SFX 2808 es som .
SFX 2809 N 1
SFX 2809 es sy .
SFX 2810 N 1
SFX 2810 es si .
SFX 2811 N 1
SFX 2811 es sov .
SFX 2812 N 1
SFX 2812 es soch .
SFX 2813 N 1
SFX 2813 es sami .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 cť m .
PFX 2814 Y 1
PFX 2814 p peč .
SFX 2815 Y 1
SFX 2815 cť š .
PFX 2815 Y 1
PFX 2815 p peč .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 cť 0 .
PFX 2816 Y 1
PFX 2816 p peč .
SFX 2817 Y 1
SFX 2817 cť me .
PFX 2817 Y 1
PFX 2817 p peč .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 cť te .
PFX 2818 Y 1
PFX 2818 p peč .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 a 0 .
PFX 2819 Y 1
PFX 2819 pi pí .
SFX 2820 N 1
SFX 2820 iča íč .
SFX 2821 N 1
SFX 2821 ece iec .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 a 0 .
PFX 2822 Y 1
PFX 2822 pl pli .
SFX 2823 N 1
SFX 2823 eva iev .
SFX 2824 N 1
SFX 2824 nec ca .
SFX 2825 N 1
SFX 2825 nec cu .
SFX 2826 N 1
SFX 2826 nec ci .
SFX 2827 N 1
SFX 2827 nec com .
SFX 2828 N 1
SFX 2828 nec ce .
SFX 2829 N 1
SFX 2829 nec cov .
SFX 2830 N 1
SFX 2830 nec coch .
SFX 2831 N 1
SFX 2831 nec cami .
SFX 2832 N 1
SFX 2832 e šie .
SFX 2833 Y 1
SFX 2833 e šie .
PFX 2833 Y 1
PFX 2833 0 naj .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 ť me .
PFX 2834 Y 1
PFX 2834 0 po .
SFX 2835 Y 1
SFX 2835 ť te .
PFX 2835 Y 1
PFX 2835 0 po .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 ť jú .
PFX 2836 Y 1
PFX 2836 0 po .
SFX 2837 Y 1
SFX 2837 ť m .
PFX 2837 Y 1
PFX 2837 0 po .
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 ť š .
PFX 2838 Y 1
PFX 2838 0 po .
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 a 0 .
PFX 2839 Y 1
PFX 2839 po pô .
SFX 2840 N 1
SFX 2840 oma ôm .
SFX 2841 N 1
SFX 2841 le ľa .
SFX 2842 N 1
SFX 2842 le ľu .
SFX 2843 N 1
SFX 2843 en nách .
SFX 2844 N 1
SFX 2844 et ta .
SFX 2845 N 1
SFX 2845 y šie .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 y šie .
PFX 2846 Y 1
PFX 2846 0 naj .
SFX 2847 N 1
SFX 2847 yje ýj .
SFX 2848 N 1
SFX 2848 iedko edšie .
SFX 2849 Y 1
SFX 2849 iedko edšie .
PFX 2849 Y 1
PFX 2849 0 naj .
SFX 2850 N 1
SFX 2850 iptum ípt .
SFX 2851 N 1
SFX 2851 auna áun .
SFX 2852 N 1
SFX 2852 a ejšie .
SFX 2853 Y 1
SFX 2853 a ejšie .
PFX 2853 Y 1
PFX 2853 0 naj .
SFX 2854 N 1
SFX 2854 ľana lian .
SFX 2855 N 1
SFX 2855 ia ov .
SFX 2856 N 1
SFX 2856 ia om .
SFX 2857 N 1
SFX 2857 ia och .
SFX 2858 N 1
SFX 2858 ia mi .
SFX 2859 N 1
SFX 2859 a ce .
SFX 2860 N 1
SFX 2860 a iec .
SFX 2861 N 1
SFX 2861 a com .
SFX 2862 N 1
SFX 2862 a coch .
SFX 2863 N 1
SFX 2863 a cami .
SFX 2864 N 1
SFX 2864 ilba ílb .
SFX 2865 N 1
SFX 2865 oso ôs .
SFX 2866 N 1
SFX 2866 ietor etra .
SFX 2867 N 1
SFX 2867 ietor etru .
SFX 2868 N 1
SFX 2868 ietor etre .
SFX 2869 N 1
SFX 2869 ietor etrom .
SFX 2870 N 1
SFX 2870 ietor etry .
SFX 2871 N 1
SFX 2871 ietor etrov .
SFX 2872 N 1
SFX 2872 ietor etroch .
SFX 2873 N 1
SFX 2873 ietor etrami .
SFX 2874 N 1
SFX 2874 rsia ŕs .
SFX 2875 N 1
SFX 2875 ká iek .
SFX 2876 N 1
SFX 2876 y km .
SFX 2877 N 1
SFX 2877 y kv .
SFX 2878 N 1
SFX 2878 y kch .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 a 0 .
PFX 2879 Y 1
PFX 2879 pu pú .
SFX 2880 N 1
SFX 2880 usa ús .
SFX 2881 N 1
SFX 2881 uto út .
SFX 2882 N 1
SFX 2882 án ane .
SFX 2883 N 1
SFX 2883 boh aboha .
SFX 2884 N 1
SFX 2884 boh ubohu .
SFX 2885 Y 1
SFX 2885 h že .
PFX 2885 Y 1
PFX 2885 pán pane .
SFX 2886 N 1
SFX 2886 boh ombohom .
SFX 2887 N 1
SFX 2887 mo em .
SFX 2888 N 1
SFX 2888 yta ýt .
SFX 2889 Y 1
SFX 2889 a 0 .
PFX 2889 Y 1
PFX 2889 ra rá .
SFX 2890 N 1
SFX 2890 az áz .
SFX 2891 Y 1
SFX 2891 a 0 .
PFX 2891 Y 1
PFX 2891 r ri .
SFX 2892 Y 1
SFX 2892 cť m .
PFX 2892 Y 1
PFX 2892 r reč .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 cť š .
PFX 2893 Y 1
PFX 2893 r reč .
SFX 2894 Y 1
SFX 2894 cť 0 .
PFX 2894 Y 1
PFX 2894 r reč .
SFX 2895 Y 1
SFX 2895 cť me .
PFX 2895 Y 1
PFX 2895 r reč .
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 cť te .
PFX 2896 Y 1
PFX 2896 r reč .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 ť 0 .
PFX 2897 Y 1
PFX 2897 ri r .
SFX 2898 Y 1
SFX 2898 ť me .
PFX 2898 Y 1
PFX 2898 ri r .
SFX 2899 Y 1
SFX 2899 ť te .
PFX 2899 Y 1
PFX 2899 ri r .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 dko šie .
PFX 2900 Y 1
PFX 2900 r r .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 dko šie .
PFX 2901 Y 1
PFX 2901 r najr .
SFX 2902 Y 1
SFX 2902 ky ší .
PFX 2902 Y 1
PFX 2902 ri r .
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 dky šieho .
PFX 2903 Y 1
PFX 2903 r r .
SFX 2904 Y 1
SFX 2904 dky šiemu .
PFX 2904 Y 1
PFX 2904 r r .
SFX 2905 Y 1
SFX 2905 ky šom .
PFX 2905 Y 1
PFX 2905 ri r .
SFX 2906 Y 1
SFX 2906 ky ším .
PFX 2906 Y 1
PFX 2906 ri r .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 ky ších .
PFX 2907 Y 1
PFX 2907 ri r .
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 ky šími .
PFX 2908 Y 1
PFX 2908 ri r .
SFX 2909 Y 1
SFX 2909 dky šie .
PFX 2909 Y 1
PFX 2909 r r .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 ky šia .
PFX 2910 Y 1
PFX 2910 ri r .
SFX 2911 Y 1
SFX 2911 ky šej .
PFX 2911 Y 1
PFX 2911 ri r .
SFX 2912 Y 1
SFX 2912 ky šiu .
PFX 2912 Y 1
PFX 2912 ri r .
SFX 2913 Y 1
SFX 2913 ky šou .
PFX 2913 Y 1
PFX 2913 ri r .
SFX 2914 Y 1
SFX 2914 ky ší .
PFX 2914 Y 1
PFX 2914 ri najr .
SFX 2915 Y 1
SFX 2915 dky šieho .
PFX 2915 Y 1
PFX 2915 r najr .
SFX 2916 Y 1
SFX 2916 dky šiemu .
PFX 2916 Y 1
PFX 2916 r najr .
SFX 2917 Y 1
SFX 2917 ky šom .
PFX 2917 Y 1
PFX 2917 ri najr .
SFX 2918 Y 1
SFX 2918 ky ším .
PFX 2918 Y 1
PFX 2918 ri najr .
SFX 2919 Y 1
SFX 2919 ky ších .
PFX 2919 Y 1
PFX 2919 ri najr .
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 ky šími .
PFX 2920 Y 1
PFX 2920 ri najr .
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 dky šie .
PFX 2921 Y 1
PFX 2921 r najr .
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 ky šia .
PFX 2922 Y 1
PFX 2922 ri najr .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 ky šej .
PFX 2923 Y 1
PFX 2923 ri najr .
SFX 2924 Y 1
SFX 2924 ky šiu .
PFX 2924 Y 1
PFX 2924 ri najr .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 ky šou .
PFX 2925 Y 1
PFX 2925 ri najr .
SFX 2926 N 1
SFX 2926 allo áll .
SFX 2927 N 1
SFX 2927 ata iat .
SFX 2928 Y 1
SFX 2928 a 0 .
PFX 2928 Y 1
PFX 2928 ru rú .
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 ásť astieme .
PFX 2929 Y 1
PFX 2929 0 po .
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 ásť astiete .
PFX 2930 Y 1
PFX 2930 0 po .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 ásť astú .
PFX 2931 Y 1
PFX 2931 0 po .
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 ásť astiem .
PFX 2932 Y 1
PFX 2932 0 po .
SFX 2933 Y 1
SFX 2933 ásť astieš .
PFX 2933 Y 1
PFX 2933 0 po .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 ásť astie .
PFX 2934 Y 1
PFX 2934 0 po .
PFX 2935 N 1
PFX 2935 rá ra .
SFX 2936 Y 1
SFX 2936 0 me .
PFX 2936 Y 1
PFX 2936 rá ra .
SFX 2937 Y 1
SFX 2937 0 te .
PFX 2937 Y 1
PFX 2937 rá ra .
SFX 2938 Y 1
SFX 2938 ť a .
PFX 2938 Y 1
PFX 2938 0 po .
SFX 2939 N 1
SFX 2939 ako ák .
SFX 2940 Y 1
SFX 2940 o 0 .
PFX 2940 Y 1
PFX 2940 sa sá .
SFX 2941 Y 1
SFX 2941 a 0 .
PFX 2941 Y 1
PFX 2941 sa sá .
SFX 2942 N 1
SFX 2942 ira ír .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 em mich .
PFX 2943 Y 1
PFX 2943 s si .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 em mim .
PFX 2944 Y 1
PFX 2944 s si .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 em mimi .
PFX 2945 Y 1
PFX 2945 s si .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 em mi .
PFX 2946 Y 1
PFX 2946 s si .
SFX 2947 Y 1
SFX 2947 a 0 .
PFX 2947 Y 1
PFX 2947 s si .
SFX 2948 Y 1
SFX 2948 o 0 .
PFX 2948 Y 1
PFX 2948 s si .
SFX 2949 N 1
SFX 2949 omba ômb .
SFX 2950 N 1
SFX 2950 inga íng .
SFX 2951 N 1
SFX 2951 o ej .
SFX 2952 Y 1
SFX 2952 o ej .
PFX 2952 Y 1
PFX 2952 0 naj .
SFX 2953 N 1
SFX 2953 iptá ípt .
SFX 2954 N 1
SFX 2954 iňa íň .
SFX 2955 N 1
SFX 2955 yva ýv .
SFX 2956 Y 1
SFX 2956 e 0 .
PFX 2956 Y 1
PFX 2956 sl sĺ .
SFX 2957 Y 1
SFX 2957 o 0 .
PFX 2957 Y 1
PFX 2957 sl sĺ .
SFX 2958 N 1
SFX 2958 lza ĺz .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 a 0 .
PFX 2959 Y 1
PFX 2959 so sô .
SFX 2960 N 1
SFX 2960 rcha ŕch .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 e 0 .
PFX 2961 Y 1
PFX 2961 sr sŕ .
SFX 2962 N 1
SFX 2962 ia ích .
SFX 2963 N 1
SFX 2963 ia ím .
SFX 2964 N 1
SFX 2964 ia ími .
SFX 2965 N 1
SFX 2965 ia ej .
